Missouri, session 2026, HB1731.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 393, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 393.2500, to read as follows:
393.2500. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri public service commission;
(2) "Customer-generator", the same as defined in section 386.890;
(3) "Electrical corporation", the same as defined in section 386.020;
(4) "Energy storage system", commercially available technology that is capable
of absorbing energy and storing it for a period of time for use at a later time including,
but not limited to, electrochemical, thermal, and electromechanical technologies, and
may be interconnected behind the customer's meter or interconnected behind its own
meter;
(5) "Smart inverter", a device that converts direct current from solar panels into
alternating current and meets all applicable safety, performance, interconnection, and
reliability standards established by the National Electrical Code, the National Electrical
Safety Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, Underwriters
Laboratories, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, and any local governing
authorities.
2. Within ninety days after August 28, 2026, an electrical corporation shall file
an application with the commission requesting approval of the corporation's tariff to
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1731 2
provide a rebate to any customer-generator installing any energy storage system and, if
applicable, a new solar electric system at the customer-generator's premises for the
customer-generator's own use. The rebate shall be as follows:
(1) Two dollars per watt for systems becoming operational on or before June 30,
2027;
(2) One dollar and fifty cents per watt for systems becoming operational between
July 1, 2027, and June 30, 2028;
(3) One dollar per watt for systems becoming operational between July 1, 2027,
and June 30, 2029;
(4) Fifty cents per watt for systems becoming operational between July 1, 2028,
and June 30, 2030;
(5) Fifty cents per watt for systems becoming operational between July 1, 2029,
and June 30, 2031; or
(6) Twenty-five cents per watt for systems becoming operational between July 1,
2030, and June 30, 2032.

The rebate amounts under this subsection shall be issued until such funds expire or
exceed the allotted amounts. An electrical corporation may, through its tariffs, require
applications for rebates to be submitted by customer-generators up to one hundred and
eighty days prior to June 30, 2027.
3. The commission shall review the application under subsection 2 of this section
and make modifications, if necessary, that are consistent with the commission's
authority under chapter 386. No later than one hundred and eighty days after the
electrical corporation files the application under subsection 2 of this section, the
commission shall hold a hearing and issue an order approving, or approving with
modifications, the tariff.
4. To be eligible for a rebate under this section, a customer-generator shall:
(1) Have a smart inverter installed at the customer's premises that is
interconnected to distribution facilities owned or operated by an electrical corporation;
(2) Install an energy storage system;
(3) Connect an energy storage system to a new or existing solar electric system
sited on the customer-generator's premises that is confirmed by the electrical
corporation to have become operational and in compliance with the provisions of
section 386.890; and
(4) Transfer to the electrical corporation all rights, titles, and interest in and to
the renewable energy credits associated with the solar electric system and energy
storage system that qualified the customer-generator for the rebate for a period of ten

HB 1731 3
years from the date the electrical corporation confirmed that the energy storage system
was installed and operational.
5. An electrical corporation's obligation to make rebate payments under this
section shall not exceed the following limitations:
(1) As of August 28, 2026, an electrical corporation with one million or more
customers in the state shall not be obligated to pay rebates in any calendar year from
2026 through 2032 in an amount exceeding five million six hundred thousand dollars or
in an aggregate amount exceeding twenty-eight million dollars;
(2) As of August 28, 2026, an electrical corporation with less than one million but
more than two hundred thousand customers in the state shall not be obligated to pay
rebates in any calendar year from 2026 through 2032 in an amount exceeding one
million six hundred thousand dollars or in an aggregate amount exceeding eight million
dollars; and
(3) As of August 28, 2026, an electrical corporation with two hundred thousand
or less customers in the state shall not be obligated to pay rebates in any calendar year
from 2026 through 2032 in an amount exceeding one million four hundred thousand
dollars or in an aggregate amount exceeding seven million dollars.
6. After the issuance of the rebate under this section, an electrical corporation
shall be permitted to recover the cost of all rebate payments it has made through either
base rates or a rate adjustment mechanism under section 393.1030 and shall also be
permitted to defer and amortize the recovery of such costs, including interest at the
electrical corporation's short-term borrowing rate, through either base rates or a
surcharge over a period of the electrical corporation's choice, not to exceed five years,
provided that if recovery of such costs in such manner and over such a time period
would cause the electrical corporation to exceed the one percent maximum average
retail rate increase limitation required by subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of section
393.1030. The recovery of such costs that would exceed the one percent maximum
average retail rate increase limitation shall be deferred by the electrical corporation to a
regulatory asset to which carrying costs at the electrical corporation's weighted average
cost of capital shall be added and recovered through base rates or through a rate
adjustment mechanism under section 393.1030 as soon as practicable.
7. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the

HB 1731 4
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔